inc/eng-verbs-flags.regex
! "Inflections" of English definitions for Cree verbs

define Consonant [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z ]  ;

define Vowel [ a | e | i | o | u ] ;

define Capital [ A | B | C | D | E | F | G | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z ] ;

define Alphabet [ Vowel | Consonant | "y" | Capital ] ;

define Punctuation [ "." | "," | ":" | ";" | "!" | "?" | "-" | "/" | %' ] ;

define Number [ 0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ] ;

define Letters [ Alphabet | Punctuation | Number | " " ] ;

define Bx [ " " | .#. | Punctuation ] ;

define Px [ "," | ";" | .#. ] ;

define TenseAspect [ "Prs+" | "Prt+" | "Fut+" | "Int+" | "Cond+" | "Inf+" | "Imm+" | "Del+" ] ;

define Subject [ "1Sg+" | "2Sg+" | "3Sg+" | "1Pl+" | "21Pl+" | "2Pl+" | "3Pl+" | "4Sg/Pl+" | "5Sg/Pl+" | "X+" ] ;

define Object [ "1SgO+" | "2SgO+" | "3SgO+" | "1PlO+" | "21PlO+" | "2PlO+" | "3PlO+" | "4Sg/PlO+" | "5Sg/PlO+" | "XO+" ] ;

! Standardization
regex [ {He} | {he} | {She} | {she} | {he/she} | {They} | {they} -> {s/he} , {him} | {her} | {him/her} -> {s.o.} || " " _ [ " " | "," | ";" | "!" | "?" | "." | .#. ] ] ;
define Standardization

! Tense/aspect conversion
regex [ [..] -> "@R.tense.Fut@" {is going to }
, [..] -> "@R.tense.Int@" "@R.subject.3Sg@" {wants to }
, [..] -> "@R.tense.Int@" "@D.subject.3Sg@" {want to }
, [..] -> "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Prt@" || {s/he } | {there } _ ]
| [ [..] -> "@R.tense.Cond@" {when }
, [..] -> [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" ] {let }
, [..] -> "@R.tense.Inf@" {for }  || _ {s/he } | {there } ]
.o. [ [..] -> "@R.tense.Inf@" {to } | "@D.tense.Inf@" || {s/he } | {there } _ ]
.o. [ [..] -> { now} "@R.tense.Imm@" | { later} "@R.tense.Del@" | "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" || _ Px ] ;
define TenseAspectConversion

! Verb inflection
regex [ {is} -> {be} || {is going to } _ \Alphabet ]
.o. [ {is} -> {be} [ "@R.tense.Int@" | "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]
, {is} -> {am} "@R.subject.1Sg@" [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" | "@R.tense.Fut@" ]
, {is} -> {are} [ "@R.subject.2Sg@" | "@R.subject.1Pl@" | "@R.subject.21Pl@" | "@R.subject.2Pl@" | "@R.subject.3Pl@" | "@R.subject.4Sg/Pl@" | "@R.subject.5Sg/Pl@" ] [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Fut@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ]
, {is} -> {is} [ "@R.subject.3Sg@" | "@R.subject.X@" ] [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Fut@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ]
, {is} -> {was} [ "@R.subject.1Sg@" | "@R.subject.3Sg@" | "@R.subject.X@" ] "@R.tense.Prt@"
, {is} -> {were} [ "@R.subject.2Sg@" | "@R.subject.1Pl@" | "@R.subject.21Pl@" | "@R.subject.2Pl@" | "@R.subject.3Pl@" | "@R.subject.4Sg/Pl@" | "@R.subject.5Sg/Pl@" ] "@R.tense.Prt@"
|| \Alphabet _ \Alphabet ]
.o. [ {s} -> [ [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] "@D.subject.3Sg@" ] | "@R.tense.Fut@" | "@R.tense.Int@" | "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" || [ {s/he } | {to } ] \" "+ _ \Alphabet ]
| [ [..] -> [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] "@R.subject.3Sg@" || [ {s/he } | {to } ] \" "+ _ \Alphabet ]
| [ {s} -> {ed} "@R.tense.Prt@" || {s/he } \" "+ _ \Alphabet ] ;
define VerbInflection

! Subject Inverse Conversion
regex [ {s/he} -> {me} "@R.subject.1Sg@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, {s/he}  -> {you} "@R.subject.2Sg@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, {s/he} -> {him/her} "@R.subject.3Sg@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, {s/he}  -> {us} "@R.subject.1Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, {s/he} -> {you and us} "@R.subject.21Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, {s/he} -> {you all} "@R.subject.2Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, {s/he}  -> {them} "@R.subject.3Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, {s/he}  -> {him/her/them} "@R.subject.4Sg/Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, {s/he}  -> {him/her/them over there} "@R.subject.5Sg/Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, {s/he} -> {someone} "@R.subject.X@"  [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]
|| Bx _ Bx ]

! Subject Conversion
| [ {s/he} -> {I} "@R.subject.1Sg@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, {s/he}  -> {you} "@R.subject.2Sg@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, {s/he} -> {he/she} "@R.subject.3Sg@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, {s/he}  -> {we} "@R.subject.1Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, {s/he} -> {we and you} "@R.subject.21Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, {s/he} -> {you all} "@R.subject.2Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, {s/he}  -> {they} "@R.subject.3Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, {s/he}  -> {s/he/they} "@R.subject.4Sg/Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, {s/he}  -> {s/he/they over there} "@R.subject.5Sg/Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, {s/he} -> {someone} "@R.subject.X@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@"
|| Bx _ Bx ] ;
define SubjectConversion

! Object Conversion
regex [ {s.o.} -> {me} "@R.object.1Sg@"
, {s.o.} -> {you} "@R.object.2Sg@"
, {s.o.} -> {him/her} "@R.object.3Sg@"
, {s.o.}  -> {us} "@R.object.1Pl@"
, {s.o.} -> {you and us} "@R.object.21Pl@"
, {s.o.} -> {you all} "@R.object.2Pl@"
, {s.o.}  -> {them} "@R.object.3Pl@"
, {s.o.}  -> {him/her/them} "@R.object.4Sg/Pl@"
, {s.o.}  -> {him/her/them over there} "@R.object.5Sg/Pl@"
, {s.o.} -> {someone} "@R.object.X@"
, {s.t.} -> {it} "@D.object@"
|| Bx _ \%' ]
,, [ [..] -> "@D.object@" || _ .#. ] ;
define ObjectConversion

! Reflexive Conversion
regex [ {him/herself} -> {myself} "@R.subject.1Sg@"
, {him/herself} -> {yourself} "@R.subject.2Sg@"
, {him/herself} -> {him/herself} "@R.object.3Sg@"
, {him/herself} -> {ourselves} "@R.object.1Pl@"
, {him/herself} -> {our/yourselves} "@R.object.21Pl@"
, {him/herself} -> {yourselves} "@R.object.2Pl@"
, {him/herself} -> {themselves} "@R.object.3Pl@"
, {him/herself} -> {him/her/themselves} "@R.object.4Sg/Pl@"
, {him/herself} -> {him/her/themselves} "@R.object.5Sg/Pl@"
, {him/herself} -> {him/herself} "@R.object.X@"
|| Bx _ ] ;
define ReflexiveConversion

! Possessive Conversion
regex [ {s.o.'s} -> {my} "@R.subject.1Sg@"
, {s.o.'s} -> {your} "@R.subject.2Sg@"
, {s.o.'s} -> {his/her} "@R.subject.3Sg@"
, {s.o.'s} -> {our} "@R.subject.1Pl@"
, {s.o.'s} -> {your and our} "@R.subject.21Pl@"
, {s.o.'s} -> {your} "@R.subject.2Pl@"
, {s.o.'s} -> {their} "@R.subject.3Pl@"
, {s.o.'s} -> {his/her/their} "@R.subject.4Sg/Pl@"
, {s.o.'s} -> {his/her/their} "@R.subject.5Sg/Pl@"
, {s.o.'s} -> {someone's} "@R.subject.X@"
|| Bx _ Bx ] ;
define PossessiveConversion

! Conversion of tags into flag-diacritics
regex [ "Prs+" -> "@P.tense.Prs@" , "Prt+" -> "@P.tense.Prt@" , "Fut+" -> "@P.tense.Fut@" , "Int+" -> "@P.tense.Int@" , "Cond+" -> "@P.tense.Cond@" , "Imm+" -> "@P.tense.Imm@" , "Del+" -> "@P.tense.Del@" , "Inf+" -> "@P.tense.Inf@" ]
.o. [ "1Sg+" -> "@P.subject.1Sg@" , "2Sg+" -> "@P.subject.2Sg@", "3Sg+" -> "@P.subject.3Sg@" , "1Pl+" -> "@P.subject.1Pl@" , "21Pl+" -> "@P.subject.21Pl@", "2Pl+" -> "@P.subject.2Pl@" , "3Pl+" -> "@P.subject.3Pl@" ,  "4Sg/Pl+" -> "@P.subject.4Sg/Pl@" , "5Sg/Pl+" -> "@P.subject.5Sg/Pl@", "X+" -> "@P.subject.X@" ]
.o. [ "1SgO+" -> "@P.object.1Sg@" , "2SgO+" -> "@P.object.2Sg@", "3SgO+" -> "@P.object.3Sg@" , "1PlO+" -> "@P.object.1Pl@" , "21PlO+" -> "@P.object.21Pl@", "2PlO+" -> "@P.object.2Pl@" , "3PlO+" -> "@P.object.3Pl@" ,  "4Sg/PlO+" -> "@P.object.4Sg/Pl@" , "5Sg/PlO+" -> "@P.object.5Sg/Pl@", "XO+" -> "@P.object.X@" ] ;
define TagConversion

! English verb inflection

! Definition of input and conversion
regex [ TenseAspect Subject (Object) Letters+ ] ;
define Input

regex [ Input
.o. TagConversion
.o. Standardization
.o. TenseAspectConversion
.o. VerbInflection
.o. SubjectConversion
.o. ObjectConversion
.o. ReflexiveConversion
.o. PossessiveConversion
] ;

twosided flag-diacritics
